Vermont, session 2025-2026, H117.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 17 V.S.A. § 2381 is amended to read:
§ 2381. APPLICABILITY OF SUBCHAPTER
* * *
VT LEG #379180 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.117
2025 Page 2 of 2

(c) In no event shall a candidate who loses a major party primary be
nominated to appear on the general election ballot pursuant to this subchapter
by a committee of any party other than the party for which the candidate
appeared on the primary ballot.
Sec. 2. 17 V.S.A. § 2401 is amended to read:
§ 2401. APPLICABILITY OF SUBCHAPTER
(a) A person may be nominated and have his or her the person’s name
printed on the general election ballot for any office by filing a consent similar
in form to the consent prescribed by section 2361 of this title and a statement
of nomination with the Secretary of State. In the case of a nomination for
justice of the peace, the consent form and statement of nomination shall be
filed with the town clerk.
(b) A candidate who loses a major party primary for any office shall not
appear on the general election ballot as an independent candidate for the same
office for which the candidate lost in the primary election.
Sec. 3 EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #379180 v.1